Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5870
Violation; penalty.

Any person who violates the Nebraska Health Care Certificate of Need Act by engaging in any activity which requires a certificate of need without first obtaining a certificate of need as required by the act or by engaging in an activity prohibited under the act is guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Each day of violation constitutes a separate offense. The magnitude of the violation is the primary consideration in establishing the amount of the fine.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 70;

Laws 1982, LB 378, § 55;

Laws 1989, LB 429, § 39;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 36.